Florida, session 2026, SB462.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 17 395.0191, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 18 395.0191âStaff membership and clinical privileges.â 19 (2) 20 (b)âAn advanced practice registered nurse who is certified 21 as a registered nurse anesthetist licensed under part I of 22 chapter 464 shall administer anesthesia under the onsite medical 23 direction of a professional licensed under chapter 458, chapter 24 459, or chapter 466, and in accordance with an established 25 protocol approved by the medical staff. The medical direction 26 shall specifically address the needs of the individual patient. 27 This paragraph does not apply to an autonomous advanced practice 28 registered nurse registered under s. 464.0123 who is certified 29 as a registered nurse anesthetist licensed under part I of 30 chapter 464; however, a facility may require a certified 31 registered nurse anesthetist who is registered and practicing 32 under s. 464.0123 to perform acts under an established protocol 33 approved by the medical staff or the governing board of the 34 facility. 35 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (4) of section 36 464.012, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 37 464.012âLicensure of advanced practice registered nurses; 38 fees; controlled substance prescribing.â 39 (4)âIn addition to the general functions specified in 40 subsection (3), an advanced practice registered nurse may 41 perform the following acts within his or her specialty: 42 (b)âA The certified registered nurse anesthetist may, to 43 the extent authorized by an established protocol approved by the 44 medical staff of the facility in which the anesthetic service is 45 performed, or a certified registered nurse anesthetist who is 46 registered and practicing under s. 464.0123 without an 47 established protocol, may perform any or all of the following: 48 1.âDetermine the health status of the patient as it relates 49 to the risk factors and to the anesthetic management of the 50 patient through the performance of the general functions. 51 2.âBased on history, physical assessment, and supplemental 52 laboratory results, determine, with the consent of the 53 responsible physician, the appropriate type of anesthesia under 54 within the framework of the protocol, unless the certified 55 registered nurse anesthetist is registered and practicing under 56 s. 464.0123 without an established protocol. 57 3.âOrder under the protocol preanesthetic medication under 58 the protocol, unless the certified registered nurse anesthetist 59 is registered and practicing under s. 464.0123 without an 60 established protocol. 61 4.âPerform under the protocol procedures commonly used to 62 render the patient insensible to pain during the performance of 63 surgical, obstetrical, therapeutic, or diagnostic clinical 64 procedures under the protocol, unless the certified registered 65 nurse anesthetist is registered and practicing under s. 464.0123 66 without an established protocol. These procedures include 67 ordering and administering regional, spinal, and general 68 anesthesia; inhalation agents and techniques; intravenous agents 69 and techniques; and techniques of hypnosis. 70 5.âOrder or perform monitoring procedures indicated as 71 pertinent to the anesthetic health care management of the 72 patient. 73 6.âSupport life functions during anesthesia health care, 74 including induction and intubation procedures, the use of 75 appropriate mechanical supportive devices, and the management of 76 fluid, electrolyte, and blood component balances. 77 7.âRecognize and take appropriate corrective action for 78 abnormal patient responses to anesthesia, adjunctive medication, 79 or other forms of therapy. 80 8.âRecognize and treat a cardiac arrhythmia while the 81 patient is under anesthetic care. 82 9.âParticipate in management of the patient while in the 83 postanesthesia recovery area, including ordering the 84 administration of fluids and drugs. 85 10.âPlace special peripheral and central venous and 86 arterial lines for blood sampling and monitoring as appropriate. 87 88 A certified registered nurse anesthetist registered and 89 practicing under s. 464.0123 without an established protocol may 90 perform acts only authorized under part I of this chapter. 91 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 92 464.0123, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 93 464.0123âAutonomous practice by an advanced practice 94 registered nurse.â 95 (3)âPRACTICE REQUIREMENTS.â 96 (a)âAn advanced practice registered nurse who is registered 97 under this section may: 98 1.âEngage in autonomous practice only in primary care 99 practice, including family medicine, general pediatrics, and 100 general internal medicine, as defined by board rule. 101 2.âFor certified nurse midwives, engage in autonomous 102 practice in the performance of the acts listed in s. 103 464.012(4)(c). 104 3.âPerform the general functions of an advanced practice 105 registered nurse under s. 464.012(3) related to primary care. 106 4.âFor certified registered nurse anesthetists registered 107 and practicing under this section, perform the acts listed in s. 108 464.012(4)(b). 109 5.âFor a patient who requires the services of a health care 110 facility, as defined in s. 408.032(8): 111 a.âAdmit the patient to the facility. 112 b.âManage the care received by the patient in the facility. 113 c.âDischarge the patient from the facility, unless 114 prohibited by federal law or rule. 115 6.5.âProvide a signature, certification, stamp, 116 verification, affidavit, or endorsement that is otherwise 117 required by law to be provided by a physician, except an 118 advanced practice registered nurse registered under this section 119 may not issue a physician certification under s. 381.986. 120 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.